Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.310

Cooperation with department of ecology.

Where feasible, the department and the state board of health shall consult with the department of ecology in order that, to the fullest extent possible, agencies concerned with the preservation of life and health and agencies concerned with protection of the environment may integrate their efforts and endorse policies in common.

[ 1987 c 109 s 25; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 12. Formerly RCW 43.20A.140.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Short title—Construction—Rules—Severability—Captions—1987 c 109: See notes following RCW 43.21B.001.